Tennessee statutes. Title 60 Oil And Gas
Chapter 3

Inspection of Volatile Oils

60-3-101. Short title.

This chapter may be cited and referred to as the “Inspection of Volatile Oils Law.”

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 1; T.C.A., § 67-3201.

Law Reviews.

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707.

60-3-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context in which used dictates otherwise:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of revenue, or the commissioner's authorized delegate;

“Department” means the department of revenue;

“Inspector” means an employee of the petroleum tax division of the department who is designated as such; and

“Oil or substance” means any oil or substance described in §§ 60-3-103 and 60-3-104.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 2; T.C.A., § 67-3202.

60-3-103. Minimum standards — Penalty for violation.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or offer for sale, or to bring to rest in Tennessee for consumption, storage, sale or use, any ethanol, methanol, benzol, gasoline, burning oil, distillate, fuel oil, gas oil, kerosene, naphtha, or substitutes for any of these by whatever trade name known, reflecting a gravity of sixteen degrees (16°) or above on the American Petroleum Institute scale or a lower standard of quality than the minimum specifications for the substances published from time to time by the United States government or other recognized authority.

It is unlawful for any person or persons to distill, manufacture, or otherwise produce ethyl alcohol, methane alcohol, or other liquids to be used as a fuel or to be blended as a fuel for combustion engines or heating oil systems without denaturing such liquid no later than immediately following the distilling process by providing for flow of the liquid from the condensing apparatus into a container containing a quantity of the denaturing agent.

It is unlawful to distribute to any manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer in this state ethyl alcohol, methane alcohol, or other liquids to be blended as a fuel for combustion engines or heating oil systems, in any container of fifty-five gallons (55 gals.) or less, unless such container is prominently labelled with the words “POISON: UNSAFE FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION”.

The denaturing agent used shall be determined by the commissioner or the commissioner's designated agent.

Each separate violation of a provision of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 3; 1980, ch. 786, § 4; 1983, ch. 144, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 67-3203; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

60-3-104. Oils and substances subject to inspection.

All ethanol, methanol, benzol, gasoline, burning oil, distillate, fuel oil, gas oil, kerosene, naphtha, or any other volatile substances, reflecting a gravity of sixteen degrees (16°) or above on the American Petroleum Institute scale, with the exception of those substances with a kinematic viscosity greater than seventy (70) centistokes at one hundred twenty-two degrees Fahrenheit (122° F) and a flash point greater than one hundred fifty degrees Fahrenheit (150° F), produced from petroleum, natural gas, oil shales or coal, by whatever trade name known, or substitutes therefor, or any other petroleum substances used as a substitute for or in the place of any of the substances herein enumerated sold or used or stored in this state, separately or in combination for any purpose whatever, by any user or storer, whether manufactured in this state or not, shall be subject to inspection under the general supervision of the commissioner before being sold or offered for sale or used or stored in this state.

Oils and substances subject to inspection as provided in subsection (a) may be inspected in transit while in the hands of the carrier, forwarding agent, or warehouseman. It is unlawful for any carrier, forwarding agent or warehouseman to unload or store any of the oils or substances before having the same inspected as provided in this section.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 4; 1980, ch. 786, § 5; T.C.A., § 67-3204.

60-3-105. Examination and testing — Records regarding transportation of substances — Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to examine and test, within this state, all oils and substances before the same are sold, offered for sale, used or stored in this state.

It is the duty of all persons handling, transporting or storing oils or substances within this state to retain records or intelligible memoranda or books subject to inspection by an inspector covering the movements of the oils or substances in this state. The records shall be retained for a period of three (3) years following the end of the year in which the records were originated.

The commissioner is authorized to examine and test all oils and substances for which there is a duty imposed upon the commissioner under this chapter, and also any products submitted to the commissioner, to determine whether the minimum standards imposed by § 60-3-103 are met and also to determine the value of such products for the purpose claimed.

The commissioner shall make and publish rules necessary to effectuate an efficient and uniform system of inspection of oils and substances.

The commissioner may prescribe standard minimum specifications for oils and substances and may promulgate rules for the uniform inspection of them. All tests shall conform to and be made under conditions and rules adopted by American Society for Testing Materials.

The gravity, purity and test of oils and substances shall be determined in the manner and under the regulations as the commissioner may specify.

The commissioner may purchase the apparatus for making chemical and physical tests of oils and substances, and may make any tests as are called for by this chapter, or as, in the judgment of the commissioner, are deemed essential for better enforcement and to afford full protection to the public.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 5; T.C.A., § 67-3205.

60-3-106. Marking of receptacles, tanks and pumps — Unlawful removal of notices or placards.

After making any examination and test, the commissioner may affix to the receptacle, tank, pump, or other container, containing oils or substances inspected, such identification or caution notices as the commissioner may designate. It is unlawful for any person to remove the identification or caution notice without authorization of the commissioner.

When any receptacle, tank, pump or other container is found by the commissioner to contain any oil or substance that does not meet the minimum specifications, it shall be the commissioner's duty to attach and seal thereto a placard bearing in bold letters a description of the substance and a warning that it is condemned and does not meet Tennessee specifications. It is unlawful for any person to remove, obscure or deface any condemnation placard described herein without the written consent of the commissioner, or in any manner to interfere with or obstruct the commissioner in the discharge of any of the commissioner's duties under this chapter.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 6; T.C.A., § 67-3206; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

60-3-107. Marking of gross weight — Fluids having no proper test.

If weight shall be established for the purpose of ascertaining quantity, instead of gauging by gallons, then the inspector shall mark on the container inspected by the inspector the gross weight instead of gallons. In addition, the inspector shall affix the inspector's brand on all containers or packages found by the inspector to contain fluids that have no proper test with the words “highly inflammable,” or with other words which properly reflect the conditions as found by the inspector.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 7; T.C.A., § 67-3207.

60-3-108. Unlawful alteration of markings.

It is unlawful for any manufacturer or dealer of oils or substances, with intent to deceive or defraud, to alter or erase the inspector's brand, to indicate a different test, gravity, purity or quantity than is found by the inspector, or to use with such intent any container or package having any inspector's brand thereon, without having the contents actually inspected.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 8; T.C.A., § 67-3208; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

60-3-109. Identification and disposition of condemned oils or substances.

Where any shipment of oils or substances is sent from another state for consumption in this state, and the same, upon inspection by an inspector, is found to be of less test than required or is otherwise indicated to be either unsafe for use or of a lower standard of quality than the minimum specifications for the oil or substance, as published by the commissioner, the commissioner is authorized to condemn the oils or substances, to mark or otherwise indicate the shipment is rejected for use in this state, and to order that the rejected oils or substances be shipped back to the shippers of the same.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 9; T.C.A., § 67-3209.

60-3-110. Inspection of oils held for export.

Whenever any oil or substance is stored in this state, or has come to rest after shipment in interstate commerce and is stored in this state, and such oil or substance is subsequently exported to a point outside this state, it shall be subject to inspection under this part.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 10; T.C.A., § 67-3210.

60-3-111. Records of inspectors — Daily reports — Locking and sealing valves — Unlawful breaking of locks or seals.

Inspectors shall keep an accurate record of all oils and substances inspected, rejected, or certified to by them, which record shall state the date of the inspection, the number of gallons approved, the number rejected, if any, the name of the person for whom inspected, and the name and address of the person to whom consigned.

Inspectors are authorized to lock and seal any or all valves at bulk plants or river terminals; and in no case shall any lock or seal which has been affixed by an inspector to a valve be opened except in the presence of an inspector.

It is unlawful for any person to break a lock or seal in violation of this section.

A violation of this subsection (c) is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 11; T.C.A., § 67-3211; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

60-3-112. Storage, unloading, or sale before inspection.

If any person, manufacturer or dealer shall store, unload or sell to any person in the state any oil or substance before having the same inspected, as provided in this chapter, the oil or substance stored, unloaded or sold shall be subject to the gasoline tax, which tax shall be collected in the same manner as now provided by law for the collection of the gasoline tax.

Any of the oils or substances found to be rejected may be forfeited and sold, and the proceeds shall go to the common school fund of the state.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 12; T.C.A., § 67-3212.

60-3-113. Prohibited acts.

It is unlawful for any dealer, distributor or manufacturer of oils or substances to refuse to admit an inspector upon the dealer's, distributor's or manufacturer's premises, to such extent as it may be necessary for the performance of the inspector's duties, or to obstruct an inspector in the discharge of the inspector's duties.

It is unlawful for any person to mix, for sale, naphtha and other such oils or substances or same with any corrosive substance, or to knowingly sell, or keep for sale, or offer for sale, the mixture, or to sell, or offer for sale any products which are not of required test.

It is unlawful for any person to violate any of the other provisions of this part with the intent of obstructing the commissioner or delegate in the performance of the commissioner's or delegate's duties under this chapter.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 13; T.C.A., § 67-3213; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

60-3-114. Report and prosecution of violation — Disposition of fine.

It is the duty of any inspector, or any other person having cognizance of any violation of this chapter, to make complaint forthwith against the person so offending to the district attorney for the county in which the offense is alleged to have been committed.

It is the duty of the district attorney to represent and prosecute, on behalf of the state, all cases of offense arising under this chapter and within any county under the district attorney's jurisdiction.

All prosecutions for fines and penalties under the criminal provisions of this chapter shall be by indictment or presentment and when collected shall be paid over to the state treasurer, one fourth (¼) of which shall be paid to the informer, and three fourths (¾) placed into the general fund.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 14; T.C.A., § 67-3214.

60-3-115. Alternative testing standard to American Petroleum Institute scale — Penalty for furnishing calibration tables on storage tanks.

If the commissioner finds that the American Petroleum Institute scale standard is impractical or outdated for purposes of testing volatile oils and substances, the commissioner may by rule provide for an alternative testing standard to that set out in §§ 60-3-103 and 60-3-104. The alternative standard must conform to and be made under the conditions and rules adopted by the American Society for Testing Materials and shall be promulgated as a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

It is a Class C misdemeanor to furnish calibration tables on storage tanks.

Acts 1978, ch. 761, § 15; T.C.A., § 67-3215; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.